Utah statutes.
57-14-101.   Title -- Purpose.

(1)  This chapter is known as "Limitations on Landowner Liability."

(2) The purpose of this chapter is to limit the liability of public and private land owners toward a person entering the owner's land as a trespasser or for recreational purposes, whether by permission or by operation of Title 73, Chapter 29, Public Waters Access Act.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2013 General Session

